Utah statutes.
61-1-17.   No finding by division on merits -- Contrary representation
unlawful.
(1) Neither the fact that an application for registration or a registration
statement has been filed nor the fact that a person or security is effectively
registered constitutes a finding by the division that any document filed under
this chapter is true, complete, and not misleading. Neither any such fact nor
the fact that an exemption or exception is available for a security or a
transaction means that the division has passed in any way upon the merits or
qualifications of, or recommended or given approval to, any person, security,
or transaction.
(2)  It is unlawful to make, or cause to be made, to any prospective
purchaser, customer, or client any representation inconsistent with Subsection
(1).
